Louisiana, session 2026, HB550.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 18:1314(E) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1314. Parish board commissioners
* * *
E. Compensation. A parish board commissioner who serves on election day
or during the counting and tabulating of provisional ballots or during a recount shall
receive fifty dollars or one hundred dollars or one hundred fifty dollars for each day
he serves as provided below:
(1) He shall receive one hundred fifty dollars for elections for which the
secretary of state has approved such compensation. The secretary of state may
provide such approval upon application by the parish board of election supervisors
when it is reasonably expected that a large number of persons will vote prior to
election day.
(2) He shall receive fifty one hundred dollars for elections other than those
provided for in Paragraphs Paragraph (1) and (3) of this Subsection.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 550 ENROLLED
(3) For an election held within one year following the date of the issuance
of any gubernatorial declaration of an emergency, upon application of the parish
board of election supervisors, the secretary of state may approve the payment of up
to one hundred dollars per election or each day of assistance, if applicable, as
compensation to each commissioner in addition to compensation otherwise provided
for in this Subsection.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.